Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.240

Proceedings, before whom instituted.

Special proceedings under this chapter may be instituted and prosecuted before the superior or district court of the county in which the judgment was entered or any judge thereof, or before the superior or district court of any county to the sheriff of which an execution has been issued or in which a transcript of said judgment has been filed in the office of the clerk of said court or before any judge thereof.

[ 1981 c 193 s 2; 1899 c 93 s 2; 1893 c 133 s 24; RRS s 636.]